test/src/morphology/VI-mesj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - мэсь: # Verb 'to be' - partial paradigm
     мэсь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: мэдмʼ
     мэсь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: мэн
     мэсь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мэ
     мэсь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: мэниʼ
     мэсь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: мэдиʼ
     мэсь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: мэӈахаʼ
     мэсь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: мэваˮ
     мэсь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: мэдаˮ
     мэсь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мэˮ
     мэсь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мэӈгу
     мэсь+V+IV+ConNeg: мыˮ
